Mississippi, session 2026, SB2142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  A person operating a motor vehicle involved in a motor vehicle accident shall not recover damages related to the accident if the operator did not have the minimum amounts of motor vehicle liability insurance required by Chapter 15 of Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, when the accident occurred. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.